Hawaii statutes.
[§188F-4] West Hawaii regional fishery
management area plan. The department shall develop a West Hawaii regional
fishery management area plan that identifies and designates appropriate areas
of the management area as follows:

(1) Designates a minimum of thirty per cent of
coastal waters in the West Hawaii regional fishery management area as fish
replenishment areas in which aquarium fish collection is prohibited;

(2) Establishes a day-use mooring buoy system along
the coastline of the West Hawaii regional fishery management area and
designates some high-use areas where no anchoring is allowed;

(3) Establishes a portion of the fish replenishment
areas as fish reserves where no fishing of reef-dwelling fish is allowed; and

(4) Designates areas where the use of gill nets as
set nets shall be prohibited. [L 1998, c 306, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next